apertium-rus.rus.dix
    <pardef n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn">
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ей</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>й</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ям</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ями</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ях</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn">
      <e><p><l>а</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ой</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ам</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ами</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ах</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="агит/ка__n_f_nn">
      <e><p><l>ка</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ку</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ке</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>кой</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ке</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ок</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>кам</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ками</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ках</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="активист/ка__n_f_aa">
      <e><p><l>ка</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ку</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ке</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>кой</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ке</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ок</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ок</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>кам</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ками</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ках</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="актрис/а__n_f_aa">
      <e><p><l>а</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ой</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ам</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ами</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ах</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="бабус/я__n_f_aa">
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ей</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ям</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ями</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ях</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  

    <e lm="акула"><i>акул</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="артистка"><i>артист</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="атлетика"><i>атлетик</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="бабуся"><i>бабус</i><par n="бабус/я__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="богиня"><i>богин</i><par n="бабус/я__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="взрывчатка"><i>взрывчат</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ворона"><i>ворон</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="вырубка"><i>выруб</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="героиня"><i>героин</i><par n="бабус/я__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="гражданка"><i>граждан</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="девчонка"><i>девчон</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="девчурка"><i>девчур</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="декларация"><i>деклараци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="диагностика"><i>диагностик</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="диссертация"><i>диссертаци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="дудка"><i>дуд</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="женщина"><i>женщин</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="журналистика"><i>журналистик</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="журналистка"><i>журналист</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="заявка"><i>заяв</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="инвестиция"><i>инвестици</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ипотека"><i>ипотек</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="капитуляция"><i>капитуляци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="киевлянка"><i>киевлян</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="коммуникация"><i>коммуникаци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="конфронтация"><i>конфронтаци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="копировка"><i>копиров</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="краса"><i>крас</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="краснуха"><i>краснух</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="крыса"><i>крыс</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="лига"><i>лиг</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="лиса"><i>лис</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="мадонна"><i>мадонн</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="манипуляция"><i>манипуляци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="манка"><i>ман</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="методика"><i>методик</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="молодка"><i>молод</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="монахиня"><i>монахин</i><par n="бабус/я__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="мотивация"><i>мотиваци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="надбавка"><i>надбав</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="обработка"><i>обработ</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="оса"><i>ос</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="отметка"><i>отмет</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="патология"><i>патологи</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="пенсионерка"><i>пенсионер</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="перевозка"><i>перевоз</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="персона"><i>персон</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="подготовка"><i>подготов</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="поликлиника"><i>поликлиник</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="поэтесса"><i>поэтесс</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="проблематика"><i>проблематик</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="провокация"><i>провокаци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="проститутка"><i>проститут</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="психика"><i>психик</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="разгрузка"><i>разгруз</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="резолюция"><i>резолюци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="рёва"><i>рёв</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="риторика"><i>риторик</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="рыбка"><i>рыб</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="секция"><i>секци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="сирота"><i>сирот</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="соня"><i>сон</i><par n="бабус/я__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="специфика"><i>специфик</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="сумка"><i>сум</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="тётка"><i>тёт</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="фиксация"><i>фиксаци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="фифа"><i>фиф</i><par n="актрис/а__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="фреска"><i>фреск</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="щедровка"><i>щедров</i><par n="агит/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="инсулинома"><i>инсулином</i><par n="автодорог/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="лемка"><i>лем</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
<e lm="профанация"><i>профанаци</i><par n="авиакомпани/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="славка"><i>слав</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="чемпионка"><i>чемпион</i><par n="активист/ка__n_f_aa"/></e>
